Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3307
Operator's license, defined.

Operator's license has the same meaning as found in section 60-474 and includes a commercial driver's license as defined in section 60-464 and a restricted commercial driver's license as defined in section 60-476.03 except as specifically provided otherwise in section 43-3318.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 7.